Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Article 1. In General
§ 30-5-104.
Oil and gas conservation commission; powers and duties; investigations; rules and regulations. [Effective July 1, 2023]

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission, herein called “the commission,” has jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to effectuate the purposes and intent of this act, including the authority to set, assess and collect reasonable fees as provided in this subsection. The fees authorized under this subsection shall be set in accordance with the following:

Fees shall be established by rule or regulation promulgated in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Fees shall be established in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total revenue generated from the fees collected approximates, but does not exceed, the direct and indirect costs of the administrative activity associated with the fee;

The commission shall maintain records sufficient to support the fees charged;

Fees may be imposed only for:

Applications for commission or examiner hearings and for continuances of those hearings;

Applications for administrative approval;

Applications for permits to drill oil and gas wells;

Applications for stratigraphic tests or core holes;

Injection wells subject to the environmental protection agency underground injection control program administered by the commission.

The commission has authority and it is its duty to make investigations to determine whether waste exists or is imminent, or whether other facts exist, which justify or require action by it hereunder. The commission is authorized to enter orders following any investigatory hearings if properly noticed to operators, producers and processors under the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and rules of the commission.

The commission shall make rules, regulations, and orders, and shall take other appropriate action, to effectuate the purposes and intent of this act.

The commission has authority:

To require:

Identification of ownership of wells, producing leases, tanks, plants and drilling structures;

The making and filing of reports, well logs, and directional surveys; provided, however, that logs of exploratory or “wildcat” wells marked confidential shall be kept confidential for six (6) months after the filing thereof, unless the owner gives written permission to release such logs at an earlier date;

The drilling, casing, and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas out of one (1) stratum into another, the intrusion of water into an oil and gas stratum, the pollution of fresh water supplies by oil, gas, or salt water, and to prevent blowouts, cavings, seepages, and fires;

The furnishing of a surety bond or other guaranty, conditioned for or securing the performance of the duty to plug each dry or abandoned well or the repair of wells causing waste and compliance with the rules and orders of the commission;

The operation of wells with efficient gas-oil and water-oil ratios, and to fix these ratios;

Gauging or other measuring of oil and gas to determine the quantity and quality thereof;

That every person who produces oil or gas in this state shall keep and maintain for a period of five (5) years within this state complete and accurate record of the quantities thereof, which records or certified copies thereof shall be available for examination by the commission or its agents at all reasonable times;

The payment of reasonable fees authorized under this article.

To regulate, for conservation purposes:

The drilling, producing, and plugging of wells;

The shooting and chemical treatment of wells;

The spacing of wells;

Disposal of salt water, nonpotable water, drilling fluids and other oil-field wastes which are uniquely associated with exploration and production operations;

The contamination or waste of underground water;

All aspects of oil mining operations provided that nothing herein shall limit the authority of state mining inspector. “Oil mining operations” means operations associated with the production of oil or gas from reservoir access holes drilled from underground shafts or tunnels.

To classify wells as oil or gas wells for purposes material to the interpretation or enforcement of this act, to make the determination of wells required by the Natural Gas Pricing Policy Act of 1978 [Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978], Public Law 95-621 [15 U.S.C. §§ 3301 through 3432, 42 U.S.C. § 7255] and to make any other determination of wells that be required by the United States department of energy;

When required, in order to protect correlative rights, to establish drilling units affording each owner an opportunity to drill for and produce as a prudent operator, and so far as it is reasonably practicable to do so without waste, his just and equitable share of the oil or gas or both in the pool and to restrict or limit the production of oil or gas from any well which is allowed, after the effective date of this act, as an exception to the location requirements of or as an additional well permitted under any order of the commission establishing drilling units for a pool or part thereof or of any general well spacing rule or order adopted by the commission for conservation purposes, upon such terms and conditions as the commission may determine, upon the commission’s own motion or upon application of any interested person and after notice and hearing as provided by chapter 6, Wyoming Statutes 1957 [§§

30-5-101

through

30-5-204

], as amended, and by the commission’s rules;

To adopt rules and regulations to:

Regulate the plugging, sealing or capping of seismic shot holes, and to require, and fix the amount of, a surety bond or other guaranty to ensure compliance with regulations governing all geophysical operations and to ensure compliance with W.S.

30-5-401

through

30-5-410

. When oil and gas operations as defined in W.S.

30-5-401

(a)(iv) involve seismic activities, the rules shall require a surety or other guaranty which is sufficient to protect and for the purpose of addressing the interests of the surface owners affected by the activities and which, in all events, shall be in an amount of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for the first one thousand (1,000) acres or portion thereof per surface owner for which access is sought for seismic activities and not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each additional one thousand (1,000) acres or portion thereof per surface owner for which access is sought for seismic activities. For the purpose of assuring compliance with this minimum bonding requirement, the commission may pool parcels of land of different surface owners where no single parcel exceeds forty (40) acres;

Require an applicant to certify that all underground electrical conductors outside of its facilities, fenced enclosures or posted areas comply with the national electric code; and

Require an operator to install and maintain all electrical equipment located in and around an oil and gas well to comply with the national electrical code.

To regulate, excluding discharges permitted under the national pollutant discharge elimination system, the:

Location, construction, operation and reclamation of all noncommercial reserve pits and produced water retention and emergency overflow pits used solely for the storage, treatment and disposal of drilling fluids, produced waters, emergency overflow wastes or other oil field wastes associated with the maintenance and operation of oil and gas exploration and production wells on a lease, unit or communitized area in such a manner as to prevent the contamination of the waters of the state;

Underground disposal into Class two injection wells as defined under the federal Safe Drinking Water Act of salt water, nonpotable water and oil field wastes related to oil and gas production in such a manner as to prevent contamination of the waters of the state.

To use funds collected under W.S. 30-5-116(b) to plug wells and seismic holes and reclaim the surrounding area affected by them, if the commission is unable to enforce its regulations and laws requiring the owner, seismic contractor or hole plugger to plug and reclaim and if the owner, seismic contractor or hole plugger does not have an adequate surety bond or other guaranty to cover the cost of plugging and reclamation. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create any liability by the state for failure to adequately plug or reclaim wells or holes. If oil field equipment appears to have been abandoned in the area of a well or hole which is plugged or reclaimed under this paragraph, the commission may, after notice and a hearing as provided in W.S.

30-5-105

and

30-5-106

and a finding that the equipment is abandoned, dispose of the equipment. The commission may dispose of the equipment by public sale or by transferring it to the contractor who performs the plugging and reclamation for the commission. The transfer or proceeds of the sale shall be used to defray the cost of plugging or reclamation. The commission shall promulgate rules to implement this paragraph;

To issue orders allowing the unitization of pore space associated with geologic sequestration sites pursuant to W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-320

and adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to effectuate the purposes of W.S.

35-11-314

;

To issue orders pursuant to W.S.

30-5-110

allowing the unitization of oil and gas interests with consenting coal interests that are actually consumed as a direct result of well and reservoir injections to restore or enhance the microbial conversion of hydrocarbon substrates to methane gas;

After notice and hearing, to order wells shut in and sealed and to prohibit drilling upon written notice from the department of revenue that an owner or operator owes taxes that are more than one hundred twenty (120) days delinquent under W.S.

39-13-113

or 39-14-207(a)(iv) or (v). The commission shall remove any regulation of shutting in or sealing wells or prohibition on drilling issued under this paragraph upon written notice from the department of revenue that the delinquent unpaid taxes have been paid.

The commission shall not require that filings with the commission be signed or stamped by a registered professional engineer.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 30-219; Laws 1969, ch. 139, § 1; 1971, ch. 11, § 3; 1979, ch. 130, § 1; 1984, ch. 3, § 1; 1987, ch. 211, § 1; ch. 233, § 1; 1989, ch. 41, § 1; ch. 265, § 1; 1996, ch. 31, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 54, § 1; 2007, ch. 27, § 1; 2009, ch. 76, § 2; 2011, ch. 50, § 2; 2013 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2013 ch. 151, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 50, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 30-5-105.
Oil and gas conservation commission; hearings; conducted by examiners; procedures.

In addition to the powers and authority, either express or implied, granted to the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission by virtue of the statutes of the state of Wyoming, the commission is hereby authorized and empowered in prescribing its rules of order or procedure in connection with hearings or other proceedings before the commission to provide for the appointment of one (1) or more examiners to conduct a hearing or hearings with respect to any matter properly coming before the commission and to make reports and recommendations to the commission with respect thereto. Any member of the commission, or its staff or any other person designated by the commission may serve as an examiner. The commission may also provide for additional compensation to be paid to a member of the commission appointed from the public at large or any other person designated by the commission for services performed as an examiner at the same rate as the at-large members of the commission are presently compensated. The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations with regard to hearings to be conducted before examiners which shall provide for rehearing before the commission, upon the request of any interested party, of any matter heard before an examiner. The commission may enter orders based upon the reports and recommendations of its examiners. If such an order grants the request of an applicant, and no objection to the granting thereof has been filed or made before or during the hearing before the examiner, said order shall become effective immediately. If such an order denies the request of the applicant, in whole or in part, or if a timely protest to the granting of an application is filed or made, said order shall not become effective until: (a) the time prescribed by rule for the making of a request for rehearing before the commission has expired without any such request having been made or (b) all interested parties have waived their right to request a rehearing, or (c) if timely request for rehearing is made, the commission after rehearing, shall affirm, revoke or modify such order. After an order based upon a hearing conducted by an examiner has become effective, it shall have the same force and effect as if said hearing had been conducted before the members of said commission.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 175, § 1; 1971, ch. 6, § 1.

Cited

in

Kerr-McGee Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 903 P.2d 537,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

See article, “Practice Before the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 353 (1975).

§ 30-5-106.
When hearings held before commission.

Notwithstanding any provision of this act, or any rule of the commission adopted pursuant to the powers granted to it by this act, the hearing on any matter or proceeding shall be held before the commission if:

The commission in its discretion desires to hear the matter;

The application or motion so requests;

The matter is initiated on the motion of the commission for enforcement of any rule, regulation, order, or statutory provision;

Any party who may be affected by the matter or proceeding files with the commission more than three (3) days prior to the date set for the hearing on the matter or proceeding a written objection to such matter or proceeding being heard before an examiner; or

The matter or proceeding is for the purpose of amending, removing or adding a statewide rule or administrative fee.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 175, § 2; 1996, ch. 31, § 1; 2021 ch. 149, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the (a) designation; redesignated former (a) through (e) as (a)(i) through (a)(v); added "if" at the end of (a), substituted "The" for "if" at the beginning of (a)(I) through (a)(iii) and (a)(v); deleted "or" at the end of (a)(i) through (a)(iii); substituted "Any" for "if" at the beginning of (a)(iv); and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” refers to Laws 1965, ch. 175, §§ 1-3, compiled, as amended, as §§

30-5-105

through

30-5-107

.

§ 30-5-107.
Hearings; W.S. 30-5-105 through 30-5-107 subordinate to Administrative Procedure Act.

This act [§§

30-5-105

through

30-5-107

] shall be supplemental but subordinate to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (Original House Bill No. 196, 38th Legislature) [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 175,§ 3.

Repeal. —

Energy company’s bond forfeiture complaint against the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission (Commission) was properly dismissed because (1) the company’s only recourse was to timely file a petition for review with a district court within 30 days of the Commission’s order, as the company’s complaint was outside the scope of the statute permitting declaratory judgment complaints in limited circumstances, (2) that statute was not expressly or impliedly repealed, and (3) the company’s complaint was untimely, leaving the district court without jurisdiction.
Black Diamond Energy of Del., Inc. v. Wyo. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 2020 WY 45, 460 P.3d 740,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 30-5-108.
State oil and gas supervisor; appointment; duties; authority of commission to appoint other employees; payment of traveling and living expenses.

To enable the commission to carry out its duties and powers under the laws of this state with respect to conservation of oil and gas, and to enforce the rules and regulations so prescribed, the commission shall appoint one (1) chief administrator who shall be a qualified petroleum engineer or petroleum geologist with at least ten (10) years of experience in his respective field of expertise who shall be designated and known as the “State Oil and Gas Supervisor.” Such supervisor shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission and shall receive a salary, to be fixed by the commission. The state oil and gas supervisor shall be charged with such duties as are delegated by the commission, and in addition thereto he shall investigate charges and complaints of violation of the laws of this state with respect to conservation of oil and gas, and any order, rules and regulation of the commission made in connection therewith, and report concerning all such violations to the commission. The commission may at any time, when it finds that the public interest will be served thereby appoint such other employees as are found to be necessary, to assist the commission and the state oil and gas supervisor in the discharge of their respective duties. All employees or assistants authorized by this act shall be paid their necessary traveling and living expenses when traveling on official business, at such rates and within such limits as may be fixed by the commission, subject to existing law.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 157, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 78-302; Laws 1933, ch. 81, § 2; 1937, ch. 50, § 1; 1945, ch. 124, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 57-1102; Laws 1949, ch. 65, § 29; 1951, ch. 44, § 23; ch. 94, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 30-220; Laws 1961, ch. 143, § 1; 1965, ch. 174, § 2; 2013 ch. 4, § 1, effective February 11, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to duties of state oil and gas supervisor as ex officio director of oil and gas conservation, see §

30-5-103

.

For constitutional provisions that all state officers shall be paid fixed and definite salaries, and for duty of said officers to pay all fees collected into the proper treasury, see art. 14, §§ 1, 2, Wyo. Const.

The 2013 amendment,

in the first sentence, deleted “and registered professional” following “qualified”, and added “with at least ten (10) years of experience in his respective field of expertise”.

Laws 2013, ch. 4, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 11, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Applied

in

MacDougall v. Board of Land Comm'rs, 48 Wyo. 493, 49 P.2d 663,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(1935).

Cited

in

Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land and Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).

§ 30-5-109.
Rules and regulations governing drilling units.

When required, to protect correlative rights or, to prevent or to assist in preventing any of the various types of waste of oil or gas prohibited by this act, or by any statute of this state, the commission, upon its own motion or on a proper application of an interested party, but after notice and hearing as herein provided shall have the power to establish drilling units of specified and approximately uniform size covering any pool.

In establishing a drilling unit, the acreage to be embraced within each unit and the shape thereof shall be determined by the commission from the evidence introduced at the hearing but shall not be smaller than the maximum area that can be efficiently drained by one (1) well.

Subject to the provisions of this act, the order establishing drilling units for a pool or part thereof shall direct that no more than one (1) well shall be drilled to and produced from such pool on any unit, and that the well shall be drilled at a location authorized by the order, with such exception as may be reasonably necessary where the drilling unit is located on the edge of the pool and adjacent to a producing unit, or, for some other reason, the requirement to drill the well at the authorized location on the unit would be inequitable or unreasonable;
(c) (i) Subject to the provisions of this act, the order establishing drilling units for a pool or part thereof shall direct that no more than one (1) well shall be drilled to and produced from such pool on any unit, and that the well shall be drilled at a location authorized by the order, with such exception as may be reasonably necessary where the drilling unit is located on the edge of the pool and adjacent to a producing unit, or, for some other reason, the requirement to drill the well at the authorized location on the unit would be inequitable or unreasonable;

The commission, upon application, notice, and hearing, may decrease the size of the drilling units or permit additional wells to be drilled within the established units in order to prevent or assist in preventing any of the various types of waste prohibited by this act or in order to protect correlative rights, and the commission may enlarge the area covered by the order fixing drilling units, if the commission determines that the common source of supply underlies an area not covered by the order.

After an order fixing drilling units has been entered by the commission, the commencement of drilling of any well or wells into any common source of supply for the purpose of producing oil or gas therefrom, at a location other than authorized by the order, is hereby prohibited. The operation of any well drilled in violation of an order fixing drilling units is prohibited.

When two (2) or more separately owned tracts are embraced within a drilling unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or a part of the drilling unit, then persons owning such interests may pool their interests for the development and operation of the drilling unit. In the absence of voluntary pooling, the commission, upon the application of any interested person, may enter an order pooling all interests in the drilling unit for the development and operation thereof. Each such pooling order shall be made after notice and hearing and shall be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable. Operations incident to the drilling of a well upon any portion of a unit covered by a pooling order shall be deemed for all purposes to be the conduct of such operations upon each separately owned tract in the unit by the several owners thereof. That portion of the production allocated or applicable to each tract included in a unit covered by a pooling order shall, when produced, be deemed for all purposes to have been produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon. A pooling order issued under this subsection shall expire twelve (12) months after issuance if the person authorized to drill and operate a well fails to commence operations within twelve (12) months of issuance of the pooling order.

Each pooling order shall provide for the drilling and operation of a well on the drilling unit, and for the payment of the cost thereof, as provided in this subsection. The commission is specifically authorized to provide that the owner or owners drilling or paying for the drilling or for the operation of a well for the benefit of all owners shall be entitled to all production from the well which would be received by the owner or owners, for whose benefit the well was drilled or operated, after payment of royalty as provided in the lease, if any, applicable to each tract or interest or after payment of the royalty if required under subsection (h) of this section, and obligations payable out of production, until the owner or owners drilling or operating the well or both have been paid the amount due under the terms of the pooling order or order settling the dispute. In the event of any disputed cost, the commission shall determine the proper cost. The order shall determine the interest of each owner in the unit, and may provide that each owner who agrees with the person or persons drilling and operating the well for the payment by the owner of his share of the costs, unless he has agreed otherwise, shall be entitled to receive, subject to royalty or similar obligations, the share of the production of the well applicable to the tract of the nonconsenting owner. Each owner who does not agree, shall be entitled to receive from the person or persons drilling and operating the well on the unit his share of the production applicable to his interest after the person or persons drilling and operating the well have recovered the following, subject to the provisions of subsection (h) of this section:

One hundred percent (100%) of each such nonconsenting owner’s share of the cost of any newly acquired surface equipment beyond the wellhead connections (including, but not limited to, stock tanks, separators, treaters, pumping equipment and piping), plus one hundred percent (100%) of each such nonconsenting owner’s share of the cost of operation of the well commencing with first production and continuing until each such nonconsenting owner’s relinquished interest shall revert to it under other provisions in this section, it being intended that each nonconsenting owner’s share of such costs and equipment will be that interest which would have been chargeable to each nonconsenting owner had it initially agreed to pay its share of the costs of said well from the beginning of the operation; and

Up to:

Three hundred percent (300%) of that portion of the costs and expenses of drilling, reworking, deepening or plugging back, testing and completing, after deducting any cash contributions received and up to two hundred percent (200%) of that portion of the cost of newly acquired equipment in the well, to and including the wellhead connections, which would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner if he had participated therein, if the nonconsenting owner’s tract or interest is subject to a lease or other contract for oil and gas development;

For the first well the person drills and operates in a drilling unit and under a pooling order, two hundred percent (200%) of that portion of the costs and expenses of drilling, reworking, deepening or plugging back, testing and completing, after deducting any cash contributions received and up to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of that portion of the cost of newly acquired equipment in the well, to and including the wellhead connections, which would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner if he had participated therein, if the nonconsenting owner’s tract or interest is not subject to a lease or other contract for oil and gas development;

For each subsequent well the person drills and operates in a drilling unit and under a pooling order, one hundred fifty percent (150%) of that portion of the costs and expenses of drilling, reworking, deepening or plugging back, testing and completing, after deducting any cash contributions received and up to one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of that portion of the cost of newly acquired equipment in the well, to and including the wellhead connections, which would have been chargeable to the nonconsenting owner if he had participated therein, if the nonconsenting owner’s tract or interest is not subject to a lease or other contract for oil and gas development.

During the time the person or persons drilling and operating a well are recovering costs from a nonconsenting owner as authorized in a pooling order issued pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, a nonconsenting owner of a tract or interest in a drilling unit that is not subject to a lease or other contract for oil and gas development shall be entitled to a cost-free royalty interest equal to the greater of:

Sixteen percent (16%); or

The acreage weighted average royalty interest of the leased tracts within the drilling unit.

Upon full payment of the recoverable costs as specified in subsection (g) of this section:

Within thirty (30) days after the producer has fully recovered his costs under subsection (g) of this section, the producer shall send notice to the nonconsenting owner to offer the nonconsenting owner the opportunity to participate under the pooling order as a working interest owner. The notice shall state that the nonconsenting owner may elect to participate in the pooling order or may elect to continue receiving the royalty specified in subsection (h) of this section;

Within sixty (60) days after receiving notice, the nonconsenting owner shall inform the producer whether he wishes to make an election to participate under the pooling order as a working interest owner or continue receiving the royalty specified in subsection (h) of this section;

If the nonconsenting owner fails to respond to the notice within the time specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the nonconsenting owner shall be deemed to elect to continue receiving the royalty specified in subsection (h) of this section;

Within five (5) business days after receiving notice of election from a nonconsenting owner or upon expiration of the time specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the producer shall notify the commission regarding the nonconsenting owner’s election or lack thereof.

(ii)

The state oil and gas supervisor, upon proper application therefor in accordance with the commission’s rules, may grant exceptions from such authorized location for good cause shown, either (A) where written consents to the exception applied for have been given by all owners of drilling units directly or diagonally offsetting the unit for which the exception is requested and, as to lands for which drilling units have not been so established for such pool, by the owners of those lands which would comprise the directly and diagonally offsetting drilling units if the drilling unit order for the pool involved were extended to include such additional lands, in which case said supervisor may grant such exception immediately, or (B) if less than all of such owners have so consented to such exception, where the applicant shows to the satisfaction of said supervisor (by affidavit stating the time, place and manner of mailing, or such further proof as said supervisor may require) that notice of the filing of such application for exception has been mailed by registered or certified mail with return receipt to all of such owners failing to so consent and that fifteen (15) days have elapsed since the date of such mailing without any of such owners having filed with said supervisor written objections to the granting of such exception, in which case the exception may be granted upon the expiration of such fifteen (15) day period;

(iii)

If any of the owners specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, who have not in writing consented to the exception applied for, file written objections to the requested exception with the state oil and gas supervisor during said fifteen (15) day period following the applicant’s mailing of the notice of filing, or if for any other reason said supervisor fails to grant such requested exception, then no well shall be drilled on the drilling unit involved except at the location authorized by the order establishing such unit, unless and until the commission shall grant such exception after notice and hearing upon the application as required by this act. Provided that in addition to any other notice required by W.S. 30-5-111(d) as amended, or any other provision of law or the commission’s rules, the commission shall cause notice of any hearing before it on an application for such exception to be mailed by registered or certified mail with return receipt to each of the owners specified in paragraph (ii) of this subsection at least ten (10) days before the date of such hearing.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 94, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 30-221; Laws 1963, ch. 169, § 1; 1965, ch. 174, § 3; 1967, ch. 167, § 3; ch. 224, § 1; 1969, ch. 126, § 1; 1971, ch. 10, § 1; 1999, ch. 113, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; 2020 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c)(iii), substituted “W.S. 30-5-111(d)” for “section 30-223(d), Wyoming Statutes 1957.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2011 amendment,

in (c)(iii), substituted “of this subsection” for “above of this subsection (c)” twice.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added the last sentence in (f); in (g), added “or after payment of the royalty if required under subsection (h) of this section” in the second sentence, added “, subject to the provisions of subsection (h) of this section” at the end; redesignated former (g)(ii) as (g)(ii)(A) and added (g)(ii)(B) through (j).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note to §

30-5-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Purpose. —

The purpose of this article is to provide a comprehensive regulatory program which prevents the waste of Wyoming's oil and gas resources and protects the correlative rights of property owners. Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Initially, the design and purpose of this chapter was to prevent “waste”

in the production of oil and gas, and one of the means selected for accomplishment of that purpose was the granting of authority to the oil and gas conservation commission to establish, after hearing, “drilling units of specified and approximately uniform shape [now size] covering any pool.” Pan Am. Petroleum Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 446 P.2d 550,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1968).

Commission's power to create drilling unit and order poolingof all interests. —

The state oil and gas conservation commission had the right to create a drilling unit in order to prevent or assist in the prevention of waste or to protect correlative rights and, subsequent to the establishment of a drilling unit, to order pooling of all interests, including royalty interests. Mitchell v. Simpson, 493 P.2d 399,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1972).

The oil and gas conservation commission has broad authority to establish drilling units to prevent or assist in the prevention of waste or to protect correlative rights, and once a drilling unit is established the commission has continuing authority to modify its orders to ensure that the drilling unit is not smaller than the maximum area that can be efficiently drained by one well. Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Finding mandated by subsection (a). —

The statutory language of subsection (a) mandates that before a drilling unit can be established, the commission must first find that such a unit is necessary to protect correlative rights or to prevent waste. Larsen v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 569 P.2d 87,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1977).

Findings controlled by rules of administrative law. —

The process of making the various findings and decisions under subsections (a) and (b) is constrained by fundamental rules of administrative law. Larsen v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 569 P.2d 87,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1977).

Deference to factual findings of agency. —

Complex and technical nature of cases involving oil and gas resources requires court to defer to administrative agency's factual determinations. Moncrief v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 981 P.2d 913,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1999).

Commission given authority over all persons necessary for effectuationof subsection (f) powers. —

In order to effectuate its powers under subsection (f), the oil and gas conservation commission was given jurisdiction and authority over all persons necessary for that effectuation. Mitchell v. Simpson, 493 P.2d 399,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1972).

Contract terms superseded by commission decision. —

Because the legislature authorized the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission to decrease the size of a drilling unit to prevent waste and protect correlative rights, if the commission determines it is necessary to increase the size of a particular drilling unit to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights, the commission has continuing authority to modify its previous orders. Therefore, an order from the commission can supersede some terms of a parties' contract in a reasonable exercise of the police power. Union Pac. Resources Co. v. Texaco, 882 P.2d 212,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. Nov. 1, 1994).

Subsection (g) does not deal with authority to provide forcompulsory pooling. —

Subsection (g) of this section does not deal with the authority of the oil and gas conservation commission to establish drilling units or provide for compulsory pooling. Mitchell v. Simpson, 493 P.2d 399,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1972).

Requirements for force pooling. —

The minimum requirement for force pooling is a valid drilling and spacing order, which has determined that the acreage within the unit is not smaller than the maximum area that can be effectively drained by one well in a common source of supply. Anschutz Corp. v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 923 P.2d 751,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1996).

Findings supported by sufficient evidence. —

Commission did not rely on challenged computer simulation in approving drilling and spacing unit, and sufficient evidence supported commission's finding that 320 acres was not smaller than the maximum area that could be efficiently drained by one well. Moncrief v. Wyoming Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 981 P.2d 913,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1999).

Conclusion not supported by findings of fact. —

Commission's conclusion that 80-acre drilling and spacing units would protect correlative rights of each owner in the field and would prevent or assist in preventing the various types of waste defined in this chapter was not supported by findings of underlying or basic facts. Larsen v. Oil & Gas Conservation Comm'n, 569 P.2d 87,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1977).

Applied

in

Lance Oil & Gas Co. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2004 WY 156, 101 P.3d 899,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(2004).

Law reviews. —

See case note, “Oil and Gas — Damages — Voluntary Unitization — Liability of Operator of Waterflood Project to Non-Joiner. Baumgartner v. Gulf Oil Corporation, 184 Neb. 384, 168 N.W.2d 510, 1969 Neb. LEXIS 558 (1969),” VI Land & Water L. Rev. 577 (1971).

See article, “Fieldwide Unitization in Wyoming,” VII Land & Water L. Rev. 433 (1972).

See article, “Practice Before the Wyoming Oil and Gas Conservation Commission,” X Land & Water L. Rev. 353 (1975).

For article, “The Law of Oil and Gas in Wyoming: An Overview,” see XVII Land and Water L. Rev. 401 (1982).